Colorado, session 2026A, HB1392.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-2502, amend
(2)(d) as follows:
24-33.5-2502. Office of public safety communications - public
safety communications revolving fund - creation.
(2) (d) The state treasurer shall credit any unexpended and
unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year to the
fund PUBLIC SAFETY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND, CREATED IN SECTION
24-33.5-2510 (1).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-2510, amend
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(1) as follows:
24-33.5-2510. Public safety communications trust fund - creation
- report.
(1) The public safety communications trust fund, referred to in this
section as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund
consists of money appropriated or transferred to the fund pursuant to
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, SECTION 24-33.5-2502 (2)(d), and
any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to
the fund. The money in the fund is continuously appropriated by the general
assembly to the department for distribution as determined by rules adopted
pursuant to section 24-33.5-2505 (1)(i). The primary purpose of such
distribution is the acquisition and maintenance of public safety
communications systems AND EQUIPMENT for use by THE OFFICE, STATE
departments, including but not limited to the departments of public safety,
transportation, natural resources, and corrections as provided in section
24-33.5-2505 (3)(b), AND OTHER USERS OF THE SYSTEM. Such systems shall
MUST satisfy the requirements of the public safety national plan established
by the federal communications commission, 47 CFR 90.16. This section
shall not preclude THE MONEY IN THE FUND MAY ALSO BE USED FOR the
payment of maintenance expenses OF THE OFFICE, STATE DEPARTMENTS,
AND OTHER USERS OF THE SYSTEM, including the cost of leased or rented
equipment, INFRASTRUCTURE MAINTENANCE, TOWER LEASE COSTS,
payments to local governmental entities for radio communications systems,
or payments related to public safety radio systems.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1392

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1392